Massachusetts, session 194th, H1506.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Executive Office of
Housing and Livable Communities and the Department of Housing and Community
Development shall provide priority consideration to residents who have resided in the
commonwealth for a minimum of 12 consecutive months and who are on the waitlist for the
emergency housing assistance program, when space in said program becomes available.
of 1